Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 2. Cities of the First Class

§ 5-6-201.
Jurisdiction of municipal judge; change of venue prohibited; exception
for certain civil penalties.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, a municipal judge has exclusive jurisdiction over all violations of ordinances of the city. The municipal judge shall hear and determine violations of ordinances and may impose fines not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both, to which may be added costs. No change of venue shall be granted in any case arising under the ordinances of the city.

A district court has jurisdiction to grant injunctive relief and to impose any civil penalty authorized by ordinance adopted pursuant to W.S. 15-1-103(a)(xlvi).

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 71; R.S. 1899, § 1657; Laws 1907, ch. 71, § 16; C.S. 1910, § 1751; C.S. 1920, § 1902; R.S. 1931, § 22-402; C.S. 1945, § 29-250; W.S. 1957, § 5-123; Laws 1973, ch. 206, § 1; 1981, ch. 101, § 1; 1991, ch. 206, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to power of cities and towns to enforce obedience of ordinances with fines and penalties, see § 15-1-103(a)(xli).

Sixth Amendment inapplicable. —

This section limits the jurisdiction of a police justice (now municipal judge) for violation of ordinances to a fine not to exceed $100.00 (now $750.00) or imprisonment for three (now six) months. Such penalties are for petty offenses, and consequently the Sixth Amendment, U.S. Const., has no application. Shafsky v. City of Casper, 487 P.2d 468,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1971).

Section not determinative of city's authority to pass ordinances.
—

This section relates to the jurisdiction of the police justice (now municipal judge) and is not determinative of the authority which a city has to pass ordinances. Smith v. City of Casper, 419 P.2d 704,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1966).

Authority for imprisonment must be sought elsewhere than in this section.

Brown v. Jarvis, 36 Wyo. 406, 256 P. 336,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1927).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Hoke v. Owens, 733 P.2d 240,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

District of Columbia v. Clawans, 300 U.S. 617, 57 S. Ct. 660, 81 L. Ed. 843, 1937 U.S. LEXIS 84 (1937).

§ 5-6-202.
Powers and duties of municipal judge generally; court to open every
day except Sunday.

The municipal judge shall be a conservator of the peace and his court shall be open every day except Sundays to hear and determine all cases cognizable before him. No act shall be performed by the judge on Sundays except to receive complaints, issue process and take bail.

The municipal judge shall enforce due obedience to all orders, rules and judgments made by him. The judge has the same power as the district court in the issuance of warrant, search warrant, subpoena or other necessary process and may fine or imprison for contempt offered to him or to process issued by him in the same manner and to the same extent as the district court. Before any person is imprisoned for the willful refusal to pay a fine, the court shall determine whether the defendant has an ability to pay or that a reasonable probability exists that the defendant will have an ability to pay.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 72; R.S. 1899, § 1658; C.S. 1910, § 1752; C.S. 1920, § 1903; Laws 1925, ch. 6, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 22-403; C.S. 1945, § 29-251; W.S. 1957, § 5-124; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 101.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), added the present last sentence.

§ 5-6-203.
Appeal.

In all cases before the
municipal court arising under ordinances of the city, wherein the
fine assessed exceeds the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) or the imprisonment
ten (10) days, an appeal may be taken by the defendant to the district
court in and for the county in which the city is situated, but no
appeal shall be allowed unless the defendant shall, within ten (10)
days, enter into recognizance with sufficient sureties to be approved
by the municipal court, conditioned for the payment of the fine and
costs of appeal, and the defendant shall abide the judgment of the
municipal court and not depart without leave of the court, or that
he will pay to the city of
. . . . . . . the sum of $ . . . . . . . The procedure
of the appeal shall be as prescribed for appeals from circuit courts
in criminal cases.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 73; R.S. 1899, § 1659; Laws 1907, ch. 71, § 17; C.S. 1910, § 1753; C.S. 1920, § 1904; R.S. 1931, § 22-404; C.S. 1945, § 29-252; W.S. 1957, § 5-125; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to appeals in connection with municipal courts, see §

5-6-106

.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “municipal court” for “police justice” and “justice,” and “circuit courts” for “court of justices of the peace,” and made stylistic changes

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Defendant in criminal case can appeal under §

5-6-107

,

irrespective of provisions for appeal from a police justice in this section and irrespective of other appeal provisions contained in §

5-6-106

.Badley v. City of Sheridan, 440 P.2d 516,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1968).

Appellant must file transcript of proceeding. —

On an appeal from a municipal court to the district court, the duty is on the appellant to see to it that a transcript of the police justice proceeding is filed in the district court. City of Casper v. Benaris, 74 Wyo. 58, 283 P.2d 1026,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1955).

Quoted

in

City of Casper v. Wagner, 74 Wyo. 115, 284 P.2d 409,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1955); Stroup v. City of Sheridan, 392 P.2d 517,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1964).

Stated

in

Cisneros v. City of Casper, 479 P.2d 198,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 5-6-204.
Fines and penalties to be paid to city treasurer; report of cases; failure to comply with section.

All fines and penalties collected and arising from a breach of a city ordinance shall be deposited with the city treasurer, and the municipal judge shall report at the end of each calendar month a list of all cases for violations of city ordinances instituted in his court, and the disposition thereof, with a statement of the fines, penalties and costs received. At the end of each month the judge shall deposit with the city treasurer all fines, penalties and costs received. If the municipal judge fails to report and deposit all fines, penalties and costs for a period of twenty-five (25) days, his office shall be declared vacant. If a city enacts an ordinance prescribing a court automation fee as provided in W.S. 5-6-108(a)(i), up to ten dollars ($10.00) of the fee may be retained by the city solely for the purpose of defraying costs and expenses related to establishing and maintaining an electronic citation system. The system shall collect and submit data in a form and manner prescribed by the supreme court to comply with the requirements of the judicial systems automation account under W.S.

5-2-120

. The remaining portion of the fee shall be remitted to the judicial systems automation account established by W.S.

5-2-120

. If a city enacts an ordinance prescribing the indigent civil legal services fee as provided in W.S. 5-6-108(a)(ii), the fee shall be remitted to the indigent civil legal services account established by W.S.

5-2-121

.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 75; R.S. 1899, § 1661; Laws 1907, ch. 71, § 18; C.S. 1910, § 1754; C.S. 1920, § 1905; R.S. 1931, § 22-405; C.S. 1945, § 29-253; W.S. 1957, § 5-126; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1; 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2015 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “W.S.

5-6-108

(a)(i)” for “W.S.

5-6-108

”; and added the present last sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “up to ten dollars ($10.00) of the fee” for “up to one half (1/2) of the fee” in the third sentence.

Excessive fees. —

City ordinance exacting $1.00 fee for each automobile transported in motor caravan and $2.00 fee for 12-hour parking privilege was excessive and void. Western Auto Transps. v. Cheyenne, 57 Wyo. 351, 118 P.2d 761,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1941).

§ 5-6-205.
Duty of municipal judge as to trial generally.

When a person is brought
before the municipal judge upon warrant, the judge shall hear and
determine the complaint alleged against the defendant.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 76; R.S. 1899, § 1662; C.S. 1910, § 1775; C.S. 1920, § 1906; R.S. 1931, § 22-406; C.S. 1945, § 29-254; W.S. 1957, § 5-127; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1.

§ 5-6-206.
Summoning and enforcing attendance of witnesses.

It shall be the duty
of said justice to summon all persons whose testimony may be deemed
material as witnesses at the trial, and to enforce their attendance
by attachment if necessary.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 79; R.S. 1899, § 1664; C.S. 1910, § 1757; C.S. 1920, § 1908; R.S. 1931, § 22-408; C.S. 1945, § 29-256; W.S. 1957, § 5-129.

§ 5-6-207.
Cases in
municipal court.

Cases in the municipal
court for violations of city ordinances shall be tried and determined
by the court without the intervention of a jury, and the trial of
such cases before the court shall be conducted in all respects, not
herein otherwise provided for, in like manner as criminal cases before
circuit courts.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 80; R.S. 1899, § 1665; Laws 1907, ch. 71, § 19; C.S. 1910, § 1758; C.S. 1920, § 1909; R.S. 1931, § 22-409; C.S. 1945, § 29-257; W.S. 1957, § 5-130; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “municipal court” for “police court,” “court” for “police justice,” and “circuit courts” for “justices of the peace,” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Section unconstitutional. —

This section, which unconditionally denies the right to a jury trial in all cases involving violations of city ordinances without regard to the potential sentences, is unconstitutional. Brenner v. City of Casper, 723 P.2d 558,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 594

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Stated

in

Cisneros v. City of Casper, 479 P.2d 198,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

District of Columbia v. Clawans, 300 U.S. 617, 57 S. Ct. 660, 81 L. Ed. 843, 1937 U.S. LEXIS 84 (1937); Shafsky v. City of Casper, 487 P.2d 468,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — When Should a Jury Trial Be Required in the Wyoming Municipal Courts? City of Casper v. Cheatham, 739 P.2d 1222,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 471

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 611 (1990).

§ 5-6-208.
Assessment of punishment.

If the defendant is found guilty, the municipal judge shall declare and assess punishment and render judgment accordingly.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 11, § 2.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 81; R.S. 1899, § 1666; C.S. 1910, § 1759; C.S. 1920, § 1910; R.S. 1931, § 22-410; C.S. 1945, § 29-258; W.S. 1957, § 5-131; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1; 1988, ch. 11, § 2.

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 5-6-209.
Continuances; verbal notice to witnesses as to new date of trial
valid as summons.

When a trial shall be
continued by the judge, it shall not be necessary to summon any witnesses
who may be present at the continuance, but the judge shall verbally
notify such witnesses as either party may require to attend before
him to testify in the case on the day of trial, which verbal notice
shall be as valid as a summons.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 84; R.S. 1899, § 1669; C.S. 1910, § 1760; C.S. 1920, § 1911; R.S. 1931, § 22-411; C.S. 1945, § 29-259; W.S. 1957, § 5-132.

Cross references. —

As to continuances generally, see §§

1-9-101

and

1-9-102

.

§ 5-6-210.
Punishment regulated by ordinance; maximum fine and imprisonment.

Any person convicted by a municipal judge of any offense under any ordinance of the city shall be punished by fine or imprisonment or both as provided by ordinance. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no fine shall exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for any one (1) offense recoverable with costs, and no imprisonment shall exceed six (6) months.

A district court has jurisdiction to grant injunctive relief and to impose any civil penalty authorized by ordinance adopted pursuant to W.S. 15-1-103(a)(xlvi).

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 86; R.S. 1899, § 1671; Laws 1907, ch. 71, § 20; C.S. 1910, § 1761; C.S. 1920, § 1912; R.S. 1931, § 22-412; C.S. 1945, § 29-260; W.S. 1957, § 5-133; Laws 1981, ch. 101, § 1; 1991, ch. 206, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to power of cities and towns to enforce obedience of ordinances with fines and penalties, see § 15-1-103(a)(xli).

Section relates to punishment and not to city's authority to pass ordinances.

Smith v. City of Casper, 419 P.2d 704,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1966).

Both fine and imprisonment not authorized. —

See Smith v. City of Casper, 419 P.2d 704,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 1966).

Judge has no authority to set aside ordinance providing for punishment of offenders.

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Brown v. Jarvis, 36 Wyo. 406, 256 P. 336,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1927).

§ 5-6-211.
Working prisoners; credit for work done.

Whenever the defendant
is sentenced to imprisonment for the violation of a city ordinance,
he may be put to work for the benefit of the city, if it is determined
that adequate supervision is available, for the term of his imprisonment,
and when committed for the nonpayment of a fine, or costs, for the
violation of any ordinance, he may also be put to work for the benefit
of the city, and shall be credited on such fine and costs, fifteen
dollars ($15.00) per day for each day he shall work.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 80, § 87; R.S. 1899, § 1672; C.S. 1910, § 1768; C.S. 1920, § 1919; R.S. 1931, § 22-419; C.S. 1945, § 29-261; W.S. 1957, § 5-134; Laws 1995, ch. 122, § 2.

Indigent persons. —

Former §

5-6-211

and former §§ 6-1-108 (now repealed) and

7-11-504

are unconstitutional as applied to an indigent person who lacks the
means to pay a fine; however, imprisonment is not precluded as an
enforcement method when alternative means are unsuccessful despite
the defendants reasonable efforts to satisfy the fines by those means.
Whiteplume v. City of Riverton, Civ. No. C81-068K (D. Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Brown v. Jarvis, 36 Wyo. 406, 256 P. 336,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1927).